California statutes. Vehicle Code
(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 985, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative January 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12819.

Unless the person issued the notice of reexamination requests the reexamination pursuant to Section 12818 within five working days after the department receives the notice of reexamination transmitted pursuant to Section 21062, the department shall peremptorily suspend the driving privilege of the person until the person has completed the reexamination and the department has taken the action prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 12818.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 304, Sec. 2.    Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Signature and Display of Licenses [12950. - 12953.]

12950.

(a) Every person licensed under this code shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink in the space provided for that purpose on the license issued to him or her, immediately on receipt thereof, and the license is not valid until so signed, except that if the department issues a form of license which bears the facsimile signature of the applicant as shown upon the application, the license is valid even though not so signed.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), signature includes a digitized signature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 819, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12950.5.

(a) The department shall require digitized signatures on each driver’s license. A digitized signature is an electronic representation of a handwritten signature.

(b) The department shall provide to the Secretary of State the digitized signature of every person who registers to vote on the voter registration card provided by the department.

(c) The
 department shall provide the Secretary of State with change-of-address information for every voter who indicates that he or she desires to have his or her address changed for voter registration purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 819, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12951.

(a) The licensee shall have the valid driver’s license issued to him or her in his or her immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle upon a highway.

Any charge under this subdivision shall be dismissed when the person charged produces in court a driver’s license duly issued to that person and valid at the time of his or her arrest, except that upon a third or subsequent charge the court in its discretion may dismiss the
 charge. When a temporary, interim, or duplicate driver’s license is produced in court, the charge shall not be dismissed unless the court has been furnished proof by the Department of Motor Vehicles that the temporary, interim, or duplicate license was issued prior to the arrest, that the driving privilege and license had not been suspended or revoked, and that the person was eligible for the temporary, interim, or duplicate license.

(b) The driver of a motor vehicle shall present his or her license for examination upon demand of a peace officer enforcing the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1292, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12952.

A licensee shall display his driver’s license upon request of a magistrate or judge before whom he may be brought for violation of any traffic law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12953.

In any circumstances involving accidents or violations in which the engineer or any other crewmember of any train is detained by state or local police, the engineer or any other crew member shall not be required to furnish a motor vehicle operator’s license, nor shall any citation involving the operation of a train be issued against the motor vehicle operator’s license of the engineer or any other crew member of the train.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1134, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Identification Cards [13000. - 13008.]

13000.

(a) (1) The department may issue an identification card to any person attesting to the true full name, correct age, and other identifying data as certified by the applicant for the identification card.

(2) The department may not issue a Real ID identification card to a person who holds a Real ID driver’s license.

(3) The department may cancel an identification card in order to enable compliance with paragraph (2).

(b) Any person 62 years of age or older may apply for, and the department upon receipt of a proper application therefor shall issue, an identification card bearing the notation “Senior Citizen.”

(c) Every application for an identification card shall be signed and verified by the applicant under penalty of perjury and shall be supported by bona fide documentary evidence of the age and identity of the applicant as the department may require.

(d) Prior to the issuance of an identification card, the department shall confirm that a legible print of the thumb or finger of the applicant is on file with the department. 

(e) Any person 62 years of age or older, and any other qualified person, may apply for, or possess, an identification card under the provisions of either subdivision (a) or (b), but not under both of those provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 8.   (AB 174)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13000.1.

(a) The department may refuse to issue or renew an identification card to any person for any of the following reasons:

(1) The department determines that the person has knowingly used a false or fictitious name in any application.

(2) The department determines that the person has impersonated another in making an application.

(3) The department determines that the person has knowingly made a false statement, knowingly concealed a material fact, or otherwise committed any fraud on any application.

(b) The department may declare an identification card invalid upon any of the grounds specified in subdivision (a) as reason to refuse to reissue or renew an identification card. The holder of an identification card that has been declared invalid shall surrender the identification card to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

(a) Any federal document demonstrating favorable action by the federal government for acceptance of a person into the federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program shall satisfy the requirement that the applicant submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(b) The
 department may issue an original identification card to the person who submits proof of presence in the United States as authorized under federal law pursuant to subdivision (a) and either a social security account number or ineligibility for a social security account number.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 571, Sec. 3.   (AB 35)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.5.

Commencing no later than July 1, 2027, the department shall issue an identification card pursuant to Section 12801.9 to an eligible applicant, other than a person described in Section 13001, who is unable to submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 11.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), every identification card shall expire, unless canceled earlier, on the sixth birthday of the applicant following the date of application for the identification card. Renewal of any identification card, other than a senior citizen identification card, shall be made for a term which shall expire on the sixth birthday of the applicant following expiration of the identification card renewed, unless surrendered earlier. Any application for renewal received after 90 days after expiration of the identification card, including a senior citizen identification card, shall be considered the same as an application for an original identification
 card. The department shall, at the end of six years and six months after the issuance or renewal of an identification card, other than a senior citizen identification card, destroy any record of the card if it has expired and has not been renewed.

(b) Every senior citizen identification card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13000 shall expire, unless canceled earlier, on the eighth birthday of the applicant following the date of application for the identification card. Renewal of any senior citizen identification card shall be made for a term which shall expire on the eighth birthday of the applicant following expiration of the senior citizen identification card renewed, unless surrendered earlier. The department shall, at the end of eight years and six months after the issuance or renewal of a senior citizen identification card, destroy any record of the card if it has expired and has not been renewed.

(c) An identification card may be issued to a person in exchange for the person’s driver’s license which is surrendered to the department for either of the following reasons:

(1) The person has a physical or mental condition and requests cancellation of the driver’s license.

(2) The department has revoked the person’s driving privilege based on the person’s physical or mental condition.

That card shall be issued without the payment of any additional fee.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the department may adjust the expiration date of any identification card issued pursuant to this code so that the date does not exceed the expiration date of a document submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 12801.5.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 14.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.1.

(a) The director shall establish a program that permits the renewal of identification cards by mail or through the department’s Internet Web site.

(b) The initial application for the identification card shall be pursuant to Section 13000. After January 1, 2018, the first renewal for a person 62 years of age or older shall be for an eight-year period with a maximum of one renewal by mail or through the department’s Internet Web site. All other renewals shall be for a six-year period with a maximum of two renewals by mail or through the department’s Internet Web site.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13003.

(a) If an identification card issued under this code is lost, destroyed, mutilated, or a new true full name is acquired, the person to whom it was issued shall make application for an original identification card as specified in Section 13000. The fee provided in Section 14902 shall be paid to the department upon application for the card. Every identification card issued pursuant to this section shall expire as provided in Section 13002 and shall be deemed an original identification
 card for that purpose.

(b) A person in possession of a valid identification card who has been informed either by the department or by a law enforcement agency that the document is mutilated shall surrender the identification card to the department not later than 10 days after that notification.

(c) For purposes of this section a mutilated identification card is one that has been damaged sufficiently to render any or all of the elements of identity set forth in Sections 13005 and 13005.5 unreadable or unidentifiable through visual, mechanical, or electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1008, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.

It is unlawful for any person:

(a) To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his possession any canceled, fictitious, fraudulently altered, or fraudulently obtained identification card.

(b) To lend his identification card to any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another.

(c) To display or represent any identification card not issued to him as being
 his card.

(d) To permit any unlawful use of an identification card issued to him.

(e) To do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this article.

(f) To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any identification card or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card, or to display or have in his possession any such photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless authorized by the provisions of this code.

(g) To alter any identification card in any manner not authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1174.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.1.

(a) A person shall not manufacture or sell an identification document of a size and form substantially similar to, or that purports to confer the same privileges as, the identification cards issued by the department.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable as follows:

(1) The court shall impose a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and 24 hours of community service, to be served when the person is not employed or is not attending school. No part of the fine or community service shall be suspended or waived.

(2) In lieu of the penalties imposed under paragraph (1), the court, in its discretion, may impose a jail term of up to one year and a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000). In exercising its discretion the court shall consider the extent of the defendant’s commercial motivation for the offense.

(c) Prosecution under this section shall not preclude prosecution under any other applicable provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.

(a) The identification card shall resemble in appearance, so far as is practicable, a driver’s license issued pursuant to this code. It shall adequately describe the applicant, bear the applicant’s picture, and be produced in color or engraved by a process or processes that prohibit, as near as possible, the ability to alter or reproduce the identification card, or prohibit the ability to superimpose a picture or photograph on the identification card without ready detection.

(b) Upon issuance of a new identification card, or renewal of an identification card, the department shall provide information on organ and tissue donation, including a standardized written or electronic form
 to be filled out by an individual who desires to enroll in the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry with instructions for submitting the completed form to the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registrar established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7150.90 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Donate Life California Organ and Tissue Donor Registry to mutually agree upon the written or electronic form for enrollment required by subdivision (b).

(2) (A) At any time a memorandum of understanding, as described in paragraph (1), is not in effect, the department shall, as soon as practicable, produce a written or electronic form that is simple in
 design, in cooperation with the California Organ and Tissue Donor Registrar, and shall require all of the following information to be supplied by the enrollee:

(i) Date of birth, gender, full name, address, and home telephone number.

(ii) Consent for organs or tissues to be donated for transplant after death.

(iii) Any limitation of the donation to specific organs, tissues, or research.

(B) The form shall also include a description of the process for having a name removed from the registry, and the process for donating money for the benefit of the registry.

(d) The registry enrollment form
 shall be posted on the
 internet websites for the department and the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(e) The form shall constitute a legal document under the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code).

(f) The registrar shall ensure that all additions and deletions to the registry shall occur within 30 days of receipt.

(g) Information obtained by the registrar for the purposes of this subdivision shall be used for these purposes only and shall not further be disseminated by the registrar.

(h) A contract shall not be awarded to a nongovernmental entity for the processing of
 identification cards unless the contract conforms to all applicable state contracting laws and all applicable procedures set forth in the State Contracting Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 211, Sec. 6.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.3.

In addition to the requirements of Section 13005, any identification card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13000 shall contain the words “Senior Citizen”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1042, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.5.

(a) (1) An identification card issued to any person shall bear a fullface engraved picture or photograph of the person.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not, unless requested by the applicant,
 distribute or sell the applicant’s picture or photograph or any information pertaining to the applicant’s physical characteristics to any private individual, other than the applicant, or to any firm, copartnership, association, or corporation. This paragraph does not apply to any private business entity that contracts with the department for the production of driver’s licenses and identification cards, if the contract prohibits the unauthorized use and disclosure of the information.

(b) (1) An identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 shall bear a notice that the identification card is issued only as a means of identification and
 does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.

(2) In the next scheduled revision of the identification card on or after January 1, 2023, the notice requirement specified in paragraph (1) shall be replaced by the following notice requirement:

(A) A Real ID identification card, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the identification card is issued only as a means of identification, and that it does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.

(B) An identification card that is not a Real ID identification card, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the identification card is issued only as a means of identification, it does not establish eligibility
 for employment, firearms purchases, voter registration, or public benefits, and that it is not acceptable for official federal purposes.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the driver’s license has been revised to include the notices specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 12.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.5.

(a) (1) An identification card issued to any person shall bear a fullface engraved picture or photograph of the person.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not, unless requested by the applicant, distribute or sell the applicant’s picture or photograph or any information pertaining to the applicant’s physical characteristics to any private individual, other than the applicant, or to any firm, copartnership, association, or corporation. This paragraph does not apply to any private business entity that contracts with the department for the production of driver’s licenses and identification cards, if the contract prohibits the unauthorized use and disclosure of the information.

(b) (1) A Real ID identification card, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the identification card is issued only as a means of identification, and that it does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.

(2) An identification card that is not a Real ID identification card, as described in Section 681, shall bear a notice including, but not limited to, that the identification card is issued only as a means of identification, it does not establish eligibility for employment, firearms purchases, voter registration, or public benefits, and that it is not acceptable for official federal purposes.

(c) This section shall become operative on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the identification card
 has been revised to include the notices specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 13.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13006.

No public entity or employee shall be liable for any loss or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in identification cards provided for in this article.

No public entity or employee shall be liable for any loss, detriment, or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in the sticker provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------

13007.

Whenever any person after applying for or receiving an identification card acquires an address different from the address shown on the identification card issued to him, he shall within 10 days thereafter notify the department of his old and new address. The department may thereupon take such action as necessary to insure that the identification card reflects the proper address of the identification card holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------

13007.5.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this code or in the regulations adopted thereunder, including specifically the Driver’s License Manual of Procedure, the department may verify the identity of any person born prior to 1916 who applies for an identification card, through United States Census records even though the date and month of birth are not included.

It is unlawful for an applicant to knowingly declare to the department, in writing, that no
 birth certificate exists for the applicant when, in fact, a birth certificate does exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 86.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

13008.

When used in reference to an identification card, “cancellation” means that an identification card is terminated without prejudice and must be surrendered. Cancellation of card may be made when a card has been issued through error or when voluntarily surrendered to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1340.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Digital Driver’s Licenses and Identification Cards [13020. - 13020.]

13020.

(a) The department may establish a pilot program to evaluate the use of optional mobile or digital alternatives to driver’s licenses and identification cards, subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) A pilot program established by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to both of the following:

(A) Persons who have voluntarily chosen to participate in the pilot program.

(B) No more than 60
 percent of licensed drivers for the purpose of evaluation.

(2) A participant in a pilot program established by the department pursuant to this subdivision may terminate their participation in the pilot program at any time and may, upon termination, request the deletion of any data associated with their participation in the program. Within 10 days of any such request, the department and all entities contracted with the department for the purpose of effectuating the pilot program shall delete all data collected or maintained pursuant to the participant’s participation in the program.

(3) All participants shall receive both a physical and, if requested, an immutable and unique driver’s license or identification card.

(b) In developing and implementing the use of digital driver’s licenses and
 identification cards, the department shall ensure the protection of personal information and include security features that protect against unauthorized access to information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Ensuring that remote access to the digital driver’s license or identification card shall require the express, affirmative, real-time consent of the person whose digital driver’s license or identification card is being requested for each piece of information being requested and shall be limited to only the information that is provided on a physical driver’s license or identification card.

(2) Ensuring that the digital driver’s license or identification card, as well as any mobile application required for the digital driver’s license or identification card, shall not contain or collect any information not strictly necessary for the functioning of the
 digital driver’s license, identification card, or mobile application, including, but not limited to, information relating to movement or location.

(3) Ensuring that the information transmitted to the digital driver’s license or identification card, as well as any mobile application required for the digital driver’s license or identification card, is encrypted and protected to the highest reasonable security standards broadly available, including ISO-18013-5, FIPS 140-3, and NIST 800-53 Moderate, and cannot be intercepted while being transmitted from the department.

(c) (1) In the conduct of a pilot program established pursuant to this section, any data exchanged between the department and an electronic device, between the department and the provider of an electronic device, and between an electronic device and the provider of that electronic device shall be
 limited to those data necessary to display the information necessary for a driver’s license or identification card.

(2) An entity contracted with the department for this purpose shall not use, share, sell, or disclose any information obtained as part of this contract, including, but not limited to, information about the holder of a digital driver’s license or identification card, except as is necessary to satisfy the terms of the contract. Upon termination or expiration of a contract entered into for this purpose, the contracting entity shall delete any data collected or generated in the course of activities pursuant to the contract within 30 days.

(d) (1) The holder of a digital driver’s license or identification card shall not be required to turn over their electronic device to any person or entity in order to use the digital driver’s license or
 identification card for identity verification.

(2) The holder of a digital driver’s license or identification card showing or turning over their electronic device to any person or entity in order to use the digital driver’s license or identification card for identity verification shall not constitute consent to a search nor shall it constitute consent for access to any information other than that which is immediately available on the digital driver’s license or identification card. Information incidentally obtained in the process of viewing a digital driver’s license or identification card in order to verify the identity of the holder shall not be used to establish probable cause for a warrant to search the electronic device.

(3) A request for remote access to their digital driver’s license or identification card for identity verification shall require the express consent of the
 holder of the digital driver’s license or identification card shall be limited to the content of the digital driver’s license or identification card specified in the request for remote access and shall not exceed the information available on a physical driver’s license or identification card.

(4) Consent to remote access to a digital driver’s license or identification card by the holder shall not constitute consent to a search nor shall it constitute consent for access to information other than that which is immediately available on the digital driver’s license or identification card. Information incidentally obtained in the process of remotely accessing a digital driver’s license or identification card shall not be used to establish probable cause for a warrant to search the electronic device.

(e) (1) A participant in a pilot program established by the
 department pursuant to this section shall not be required to use a digital driver’s license or identification card rather than a physical driver’s license or identification card for the purpose of identity verification nor shall their participation in the pilot program preclude their use of a physical driver’s license or identification card under any circumstances.

(2) A person or entity shall not provide preferential service based on a person’s use of a digital driver’s license or identification card rather than a physical driver’s license or identification card.

(f) The pilot program may include the issuance of mobile or digital Real ID driver’s license or identification cards upon authorization of the United States Secretary of Homeland Security.

(g) If the department establishes the pilot program authorized in
 subdivision (a), the department shall, no later than July 1, 2026, submit a report regarding the pilot program to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A review of all products evaluated in the pilot program and of the features of those products. The report shall note any security features to protect against unauthorized access to information.

(2) Lessons learned from the pilot program with regards to the utility of a mobile driver’s license program or risks and solutions related to the implementation of a mobile driver’s license program.

(3) Recommendations for subsequent actions, if any, that should be taken with regard to alternative options for digital driver’s licenses or identification cards evaluated in the pilot
 program.

(4) An estimate of the fiscal impact of the deployment of a mobile driver’s license program, including the estimated impact to the Motor Vehicle Account established pursuant to Section 42271.

(h) As part of the 2022–23 budget, the department shall report to the Legislature on the status of the pilot program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The scope of the pilot program, including pilot program goals and processes.

(2) The timeline for the pilot program.

(3) The fiscal impact of the pilot program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 18.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Suspension or Revocation of Licenses [13100. - 13559.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13100. - 13106.]

13100.

When used in reference to a driver’s license, “cancellation” means that a driver’s license certificate is terminated without prejudice and must be surrendered. Any person whose license has been canceled may immediately apply for a license. Cancellation of license may be made only when specifically authorized in this code, when application is made for a license to operate vehicles of a higher class, or when a license has been issued through error or voluntarily surrendered to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 428.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

When used in reference to a driver’s license, “revocation” means that the person’s privilege to drive a motor vehicle is terminated and a new driver’s license may be obtained after the period of revocation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

When used in reference to a driver’s license, “suspension” means that the person’s privilege to drive a motor vehicle is temporarily withdrawn. The department may, before terminating any suspension based upon a physical or mental condition of the licensee, require such examination of the licensee as deemed appropriate in relation to evidence of any condition which may affect the ability of the licensee to safely operate a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

For purposes of this division, a plea of nolo contendere or a plea of guilty or judgment of guilty, whether probation is granted or not, a forfeiture of bail, or a finding reported under Section 1816, constitutes a conviction of any offense prescribed by this code, other than offenses relating to the unlawful parking of vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

For the purposes of this chapter, “convicted” or “conviction” includes a finding by a judge of a juvenile court, a juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile court that a person has committed an offense, and “court” includes a juvenile court except as otherwise specifically provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.

(a) When the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle is suspended or revoked, the department shall notify the person by first-class mail of the action taken and of the effective date of that suspension or revocation, except for those persons personally given notice by the department, a court, a peace officer pursuant to Section 13388 or 13382, or otherwise pursuant to this code. It shall be a rebuttable presumption, affecting the burden of proof, that a person has knowledge of the suspension or revocation if notice has been sent by first-class mail by the department pursuant to this section to the most recent address reported to the department pursuant to Section 12800 or 14600, or any more recent address on file if reported by the person, a court, or a law enforcement agency, or
 to the most recent electronic delivery address provided in accordance with Section 1801.2, and the notice has not been returned to the department as undeliverable or unclaimed. It is the responsibility of a holder of a driver’s license to report changes of address to the department pursuant to Section 14600.

(b) The department may utilize alternative methods for determining the whereabouts of a driver whose driving privilege has been suspended or revoked pursuant to this code for the purpose of providing the driver with notice of suspension or revocation. Alternative methods may include, but are not limited to, cooperating with other state agencies that maintain more current address information than the department’s driver’s license files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 838, Sec. 8.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suspension or Revocation by Court [13200. - 13210.]

13200.

Whenever any person licensed under this code is convicted of a violation of any provision of this code relating to the speed of vehicles or a violation of Section 23103 the court may, unless this code makes mandatory a revocation by the department, suspend the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle for a period of not to exceed 30 days upon a first conviction, for a period of not to exceed 60 days upon a second conviction, and for a period of not to exceed six months upon a third or any subsequent conviction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13200.5.

Whenever any person licensed under this code is convicted of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 22348, the court may, unless this code makes mandatory a revocation by the department, suspend the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle for a period of not to exceed 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

A court may suspend, for not more than six months, the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle upon conviction of any of the following offenses:

(a) Failure of the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident to stop or otherwise comply with Section 20002.

(b) Reckless driving proximately causing bodily injury to a person under Section 23104 or 23105.

(c) Failure of the driver of a vehicle to stop at a railway grade crossing as required by Section 22452.

(d) Evading a peace officer in violation of Section 2800.1 or 2800.2, or in violation of Section 2800.3 if the person’s license is not revoked for that violation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13351.

(e) (1) Knowingly causing or participating in a vehicular collision, or any other vehicular accident, for the purpose of presenting or causing to be presented any false or fraudulent insurance claim.

(2) In lieu of suspending a person’s driving privilege pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may order the privilege to operate a motor vehicle restricted to necessary travel to and from that person’s place of employment for not more than six months. If driving a motor vehicle is necessary to perform the duties of the person’s employment, the court may restrict the driving privilege to allow driving in that person’s scope of employment. Whenever a person’s driving privilege is restricted pursuant to this paragraph, the person shall be required to maintain proof of financial responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.5.
